USR-to-hindi/apertium_hn_canonical_LC.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<!-- Generated canonical form dictionary -->
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="parsarg:re" c="re"/>
<sdef n="cat:n" c="Noun"/>
<sdef n="cat:p" c="Pronoun"/>
<sdef n="cat:v" c="verb"/>
<sdef n="cat:vn" c="verbal noun"/>
<sdef n="cat:adj" c="Adjective"/>
<sdef n="cat:sh" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="cat:prsg" c="parsarg(ViBakwi-PostPosition)"/>
<sdef n="cat:cnj" c="conjunction"/>
<sdef n="cat:prawyaya" c="prawyaya"/>

<sdef n="gen:m" c="masculine"/>
<sdef n="gen:f" c="feminine"/>
<sdef n="gen:ne" c="neuter"/>

<sdef n="case:d" c="direct"/>
<sdef n="case:o" c="oblique"/>
<!-- <sdef n="case:Shashthi" c="shashthi"/> instead added parsarg:kA -->
<sdef n="parsarg:re" c="re"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ne" c="ne"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ko" c="ko"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:se" c="se"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ke" c="ke"/>

<sdef n="parsarg:meM" c="meM"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:meM_se" c="meM_se"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:kA" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:kI" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:para" c="para"/>

<sdef n="num:s" c="singular"/>
<sdef n="num:p" c="plural"/>

<sdef n="fnum:s" c="following noun singular"/>
<sdef n="fnum:p" c="following noun plural"/>

<sdef n="per:u" c="first"/>
<sdef n="per:m" c="second"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h0" c="second_honorific wu jA"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h1" c="second_honorific wuma jAo"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h2" c="second_honorific Apa jAyie"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h" c="second_honorific"/>
<sdef n="per:a" c="third"/>

<sdef n="tam:adv_we_hue" c="adverbial we hue (no change)"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_wA_huA" c="adjective (kqxanwa) Rising sun"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_yA_huA" c="adjective ed/en -- He is a changed person now -- "/>
<sdef n="tam:we_rahanA_hE" c="adverbial we_rahanA_hE (no change)"/>
<sdef n="tam:imper" c="imperative(AjFArWaka)"/>  
<sdef n="tam:subj" c="subjunctive"/>
<sdef n="tam:nA" c="nA"/>
<sdef n="tam:wA" c="wA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA" c="yA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA1" c="yA1"/>
<sdef n="tam:kara" c="kara"/>
<sdef n="tam:gA" c="gA"/>
<sdef n="tam:hE" c="hE"/>
<sdef n="tam:WA" c="WA"/>
<sdef n="tam:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="tam:a" c="a"/>
<sdef n="tam:exA" c="exA"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>


<pardef n="ladak/A__noun">
    <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r>e<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r>e<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r>IyAM<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bUdh/A__n">
  <e><p><l></l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>en<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>ya<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>an<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  
</pardef>


<pardef n="badZ/A__adj">
  <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>A<s n="cat:"/><s n="case:"/><s n="per:"/><s n="num:"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!--added from temp dix file only dZ wale words-->  

<pardef n="ladZak/A__n">
  <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>IyAM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>IyoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>IyoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>apana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>apana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>apanA</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  
<pardef n="pedZ/a__n">
  <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  
<pardef n="pIdZ/A__n">
  <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>AeM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>AeM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>AoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>AoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwa</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwa</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwA</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwA</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwAoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwAoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwAeM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iwAeM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>AxAyaka</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>AhIna</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>AxAyI</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ladZA/I__n">
  <e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>IyAM</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>IyoM</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>IyoM</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ku</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="badZ"><i>badZ</i><par n="badZ/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ladZak"><i>ladZak</i><par n="ladZak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="pedZ"><i>pedZ</i><par n="pedZ/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="pIdZ"><i>pIdZ</i><par n="pIdZ/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="ladZA"><i>ladZA</i><par n="ladZA/I__n"/></e>
